Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 114
DISSOLUTION

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see §§ 7-90-102 and 7-101-401.

Law reviews:

For article, "Commercial and Corporate Law", which discusses a Tenth Circuit decision dealing with criminal liability of corporations and partnerships for acts committed prior to dissolution, see 64 Den. U. L. Rev. 176 (1987).

Section

PART 1 VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTION

PART 2 ADMINISTRATIVE DISSOLUTION

PART 3 JUDICIAL DISSOLUTION

PART 4 MISCELLANEOUS